District of Columbia statutes.
32-153

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. As of January 1, 2017, the Mayor may expand through rulemaking the definition of “covered employer” in § 32-151(1) to include employers with fewer than 20 employees.

History

Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 303, 61 DCR 8045

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(c) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that § 303 of the act shall apply as of December 17, 2014.